California statutes. Public Utilities Code
Immediately upon the entry of the order declaring the result of the election, the clerk of the legislative body or the registrar of voters of any municipal corporation having a board of election commissioners and a registrar of voters, shall make copies, in duplicate, of the order, and shall attach to each copy his certificate under the seal, if any, of the municipal corporation, or of the board of election commissioners, certifying that it is a true and correct copy of the order. The clerk or registrar of voters, as the case may be, shall forthwith file one copy in the office of the commission and the other in the Office of the
 Secretary of State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2971.

Immediately upon the filing of a certified copy of the order in the office of the commission, the powers of control theretofore vested in the municipal corporation over any class or classes of public utilities which a majority of the qualified electors of the municipal corporation voting thereon have voted not to retain, as shown by the order, thereupon vests in and shall be exercised by the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2972.

Any municipal corporation which has retained the powers of control vested therein respecting any class or classes of public utilities may thereafter surrender its powers of control as to such class or classes of public utilities at a general municipal election, or at a special election called for that purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2973.

The ballots to be used at the election shall have printed thereon, in addition to the other matters required by law, separate propositions as to each class of public utilities as to which the municipal corporation may retain its powers of control and as to which it is desired to vote. As to each of such classes of public utilities, and in addition to the other matters required by law to be printed thereon, a proposition shall be printed on the ballot to be used at the election in substantially the following form: “Shall ______ (name of municipal corporation) surrender its powers of control over ______ (here insert class of public utility) to the Public Utilities Commission?”
 To the right of or below each proposition to be voted upon, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of surrendering of the powers of control of the municipal corporation. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against the surrendering of those powers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 28.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2974.

The provisions of this chapter, insofar as applicable, shall govern elections called, conducted, and held under the provisions of this article and general municipal elections at which the propositions to surrender control of public utilities are submitted. If it appears from the result of the election declared as provided in this article, that a majority of the qualified electors of a municipal corporation have voted to surrender the powers of control of the municipal corporation respecting any particular class of public utility, the municipal corporation is deemed to have surrendered its powers of control as to such class of public
 utility to the commission, and such powers shall thereafter vest in and be exercised by the commission, as provided by law, upon the filing, in the office of the commission, of a certified copy of the order declaring the result of the election. If it appears from the result of the election, as declared, that a majority of the qualified electors have voted not to surrender the powers of control respecting any particular class of public utility, such powers of control shall continue in the municipal corporation. Such powers of control may thereafter be surrendered by the municipal corporation at any subsequent election at which the question of surrender may again be submitted under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2975.

The holding of a special election, or the submission of propositions at any general municipal election, under any of the provisions of this chapter, shall not be construed to preclude the holding of a subsequent special election or the subsequent submission of propositions at a general municipal election, on the question of the retention or surrender by a municipal corporation of its powers of control respecting any class of public utilities. However, not more than one such special election shall be held within any period of 12 months.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2976.

Except as otherwise in this chapter provided, the holding and conducting of elections pursuant to this chapter, the form of the ballots used, the opening and closing of the polls, the canvass of the returns, and the declaring of the result shall conform to such laws as are applicable to special municipal elections held in the municipal corporation affected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. PRODUCTION AND TRANSMISSION OF PUBLIC UTILITY COMMODITIES AND SERVICES [3001. - 3255.]



  CHAPTER 1. Gas Producers’ Cooperative Associations [3001. - 3224.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [3001. - 3004.]

3001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3002.

“Association” means any corporation which is organized pursuant to this chapter. An association is incorporated or organized pursuant to this chapter and is a producer of gas within the meaning of this chapter if it is functioning under, or is subject to, this chapter, regardless of whether it was originally incorporated pursuant to this chapter or was incorporated under other provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3003.

“Member” includes members of associations without capital stock and holders of common stock in associations which are organized with shares of stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3004.

“Gas” means all gas produced in this state, natural or manufactured, except propane, for light, heat, or power.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [3021. - 3031.]

3021.

The purpose of this chapter is to do all of the following:

(a) Promote, foster, and encourage the intelligent and orderly marketing of gas through cooperation.

(b) Make the delivery of gas from producer to distributor as direct as can be efficiently done.

(c) Free producers from unreasonable constraints imposed by limited access to market.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3022.

In enacting this chapter, the Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) California gas production is an important part of the state’s gas supply. 

(b) The actual delivered cost of California produced gas is presently lower than the cost of alternative out-of-state and Canadian gas supplies.

(c) California gas is produced and made available by California businesses and California taxpayers employing California workers.

(d) California gas consumers are entitled to a “least cost supply mix” in the gas supplies made available to them for purchase.

(e) California consumers and California producers of gas are entitled to be free of artificial constraints and unreasonable burdens on the marketing of California gas at a fair price.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3023.

Associations are “nonprofit,” since they are not organized to make profit for themselves, as such, or for their members, as such, but only for their members as producers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3024.

Any provision of law which is in conflict with this chapter does not apply to any association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3025.

Any exemption under any existing law which applies to gas in the possession, or under the control, of the individual producer, applies equally to gas in the possession, or under the control, of an association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3026.

No person, corporation, or association, that is hereafter organized or doing business in this state, may use the word “cooperative” as part of its corporate name or other business name or title for gas producers’ cooperative marketing activities, unless it has complied with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3027.

Any person, corporation, or association which is organized pursuant to any previously existing statute for the purpose of cooperatively selling gas is deemed to be organized and existing pursuant to this chapter, and this chapter applies to that person, corporation, or association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3028.

An association is not any of the following:

(a) A conspiracy, a combination in restraint of trade, or an illegal monopoly. 

(b) An attempt to lessen competition, to fix prices arbitrarily, or to create a combination or pool in violation of any law of this state.

(c) A public utility for any purpose under Part 1 (commencing with Section 201).

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3029.

The marketing contracts and agreements between an association and its members, and any agreements authorized in this chapter, are not illegal, in restraint of trade, or contrary to any statute which is enacted against pooling or combinations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3030.

The General Corporation Law (Division 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code) applies to each association which is organized pursuant to this chapter, except where this chapter provides otherwise. For the purpose of associations organized without shares of stock, the members are deemed to be “shareholders” as the term is used in the General Corporation Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3031.

It is an unfair trade practice, and unlawful, for any gas corporation to do any of the following:

(a) Interfere with, restrain, coerce, or boycott any person engaged in the production of gas within the state in the exercise of any right described in this chapter.

(b) Discriminate against any person engaged in the production of gas within the state with respect to price, delivery, or other terms of purchase of gas by reason of membership in or contract with any association formed pursuant to this chapter.

(c) Pay or loan money or give any thing of value as an inducement or reward for refusing or ceasing to belong to, or for breaching one’s membership agreement in, an association.

(d) Maliciously or knowingly give false reports about the finances, management, or activities of any person subject to this chapter.

(e) Refuse to negotiate or bargain at reasonable times and for reasonable periods of time with a genuine desire to reach agreement and a serious attempt to resolve differences with an association for price, terms of sale, terms of transportation, compensation for gas produced under contract, or any other contract provision relative to gas production represented by an association, except that nothing in this subdivision requires a gas corporation to reach agreement on price, delivery terms, transportation terms, compensation, or any other contract term.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Purposes [3051. - 3051.]

3051.

Three or more natural persons, all of whom are residents of this state, who are engaged in the production of gas within this state, may form an association pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of engaging in any activity in connection with any of the following:

(a) The selling of gas produced by its members.

(b) The storing, handling, transportation, or utilization of gas or the manufacturing or making of byproducts of gas.

(c) The manufacturing, selling, or supplying to its members of machinery, equipment, or supplies directly related to the production, transmission, storage, or marketing of gas.

(d) The financing of any activity specified in this section.

(e) The representation of its members in bargaining and negotiations concerning any sale of gas to a third party, either pursuant to an existing contract or a new contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 349, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Articles of Incorporation [3061. - 3063.]

3061.

The articles of incorporation of the association shall show that the signers of the articles of incorporation are engaged in the production of gas, state that they propose to incorporate an association pursuant to this chapter, and shall state all of the following:

(a) The name of the association.

(b) The purposes for which it is formed.

(c) The county where the principal office for the transaction of business of the association is to be located.

(d) The number of directors of the association, which shall be not less than three, and the names and addresses of the persons who are to serve as the first directors. If it is desired that the first directors serve for terms of different length, the term for which each person so named shall serve shall also be stated.

(e) If organized without shares of stock, whether the voting power and the property rights and interest of each member are equal or unequal. If voting power and property rights and interest of each member are unequal, the general rule or rules which are applicable to all members by which the voting power and the property rights and interests, respectively, of each member may be determined and fixed shall also be stated.

(f) If organized with shares of stock, the number of shares which may be issued and, if the shares are to have a par value, the par value of each share, and the aggregate par value of all shares. If the shares are to be without par value, it shall be so stated.

If the shares of stock are to be classified, a description of the classes of shares and a statement of the number of shares of each kind or class and the nature and extent of the preferences, rights, privileges, and restrictions which are granted to, or imposed upon, the holders of the respective classes of stock.

Except as to the matters and things so stated, no distinction shall exist between the classes of stock or the holders of them. One class of stock shall always be known as common stock, and the voting power may be restricted to holders of common stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3062.

Articles of incorporation shall be signed, acknowledged, and filed in the manner which is prescribed by the general laws of this state for domestic corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3063.

The articles of incorporation of any association may be amended in the manner and for the purposes which are authorized by the General Corporation Law (Division 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Bylaws [3081. - 3092.]

3081.

Each association shall, within 30 days after its incorporation, adopt for its government and management a code of bylaws that is not inconsistent with this chapter. The vote or written assent of the members that hold at least a majority of the voting power is necessary to adopt the bylaws and is effective to repeal or amend the bylaws or to adopt additional bylaws.

The power to repeal and amend the bylaws, and to adopt new bylaws, may, by a similar vote or similar written assent, be delegated to the board of directors, which authority may, by a similar vote or similar written assent, be revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3082.

The bylaws may prescribe the time, place, and manner of calling and conducting meetings. Meetings of members shall be held at the place specified in the bylaws or, if no such provision is made, the meetings shall be held in the city where the principal place of business is located at a place designated by the board of directors. Meetings of the board of directors may be held at any place within or outside the state which is fixed by a majority of the board of directors, unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3083.

The bylaws may prescribe the number of stockholders or members which constitutes a quorum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3084.

The bylaws may prescribe the right of members to vote by proxy or by mail, or both; the conditions, manner, form, and effects of their votes; the right of members to cumulate their votes; and the prohibition, if desired, of cumulative voting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3085.

The bylaws may prescribe the number of directors which constitutes a quorum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3086.

(a) The bylaws may prescribe the qualifications, compensation, duties, and term of office of the directors and officers and the time of their election. 

(b) The number of directors set forth in the articles of incorporation shall be either a fixed number or a variable number. If a fixed number, it shall not be less than three. If a variable number, the stated minimum shall not be less than three and the stated maximum shall not be more than two times the stated minimum minus one.

(c) The number of directors may also be set forth in the bylaws either as a fixed number or as a variable number subject to the same limitations as in subdivision (b). After members have been admitted, any adoption or amendment of the bylaw provision shall be subject to approval pursuant to Section 152 of the Corporations Code.

(d) In the event of an inconsistency between an article provision referred to in subdivision (b) and a bylaw provision referred to in subdivision (c), the provision more recently adopted or amended shall prevail.

(e) If a variable number of directors is set forth in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, the exact number of directors shall be fixed, within the limits specified, by approval of the board of directors or by the members pursuant to Section 153 of the Corporations Code in the manner designated in the bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3087.

The bylaws may prescribe penalties for violations of the bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3088.

The bylaws may prescribe the amount of entrance, organization, and membership fees, if any; the manner and method of collection of these fees; and the purposes for which they may be used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3089.

The bylaws may prescribe the amount which each member shall be required to pay annually, or from time to time if at all, to carry on the business of the association; the charge, if any, to be paid by each member or for services rendered by the association and the time of payment and the manner of collection; and the marketing contract between the association and its members which every member may be required to sign.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3090.

The bylaws may prescribe the amount of any dividends which may be declared on the stock or membership capital, which shall not exceed 8 percent per annum, shall be in the nature of interest, and shall not affect the nonprofit character of any association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3091.

The bylaws may prescribe the number and qualification of members of the association and the conditions precedent to membership; the method, time, and manner of permitting members to withdraw or to transfer their stock; the manner of assignment and transfer of the interest of members; the conditions upon which, and time when, membership of any member shall cease; the automatic supsension of the rights of a member who ceases to be eligible for membership in the association; and the mode, manner, and effect of the expulsion of a member.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3092.

The bylaws may prescribe the manner of determining the value of a member’s interest and provision for its purchase by the association upon the death or withdrawal of a member or upon the expulsion of a member or forfeiture of membership or, at the option of the association, the purchase at a price fixed by conclusive appraisal by the board of directors. In case of the expulsion of a member, and where the bylaws do not provide any procedure or penalty, the board of directors shall equitably and conclusively appraise the member’s property interest in the association and shall fix the amount of that property interest in money, which shall be paid to the member within one year after expulsion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Directors and Management [3101. - 3110.]

3101.

The affairs of the association shall be managed by a board of not less than three directors who are elected by the members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3102.

The bylaws may provide that the territory in which the association has members shall be divided into districts and that directors shall be elected from the several districts. In that case, the bylaws shall specify the number of directors to be elected by each district, and the manner and method of reapportioning the directors and of redistricting the territory of the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3103.

The bylaws may provide that primary elections shall be held to nominate directors. If the bylaws provide that the territory in which the association has members shall be divided into districts, the bylaws may also provide that the results of the primary elections in the various districts shall be final and shall be ratified at the annual meeting of the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3104.

The bylaws may provide that the territory in which the association has members shall be divided into districts and that the directors shall be elected by representatives or advisers, who themselves have been elected by the members from the districts. In that case, the bylaws shall specify the number of representatives or advisers to be elected by each district, and the manner and method of reapportioning the representatives or advisers and of redistricting the territory of the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3105.

The bylaws may provide that one or more directors may be appointed by any public official or commission or by the other directors selected by the members. These directors so appointed shall represent primarily the interest of the general public. These directors shall have the same powers and rights as the other directors. The directors so chosen shall not number more than one-fifth of the entire number of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3106.

The bylaws may provide for an executive committee and may delegate to the committee all the functions and powers of the board of directors, subject to the general direction and control of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3107.

The association may provide a fair remuneration for the time which is actually spent by its officers and directors in its service and for the service of the members of its executive committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3108.

If a vacancy on the board of directors occurs except by expiration of a term, the remaining members of the board, by a majority vote, shall fill the vacancy unless the bylaws provide for an election of directors by districts. If the bylaws provide for an election of directors by districts, the vacancy shall be filled by the election of a director from the district in which the vacancy occurs or the board may call a special meeting of the members in that district to fill the vacancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3109.

The directors shall elect a president, one or more vice presidents, a secretary, a treasurer, and any other officers that may be prescribed by the bylaws. Any two or more offices, except those of president and secretary, may be held by the same person.

The treasurer may be a bank or any depository and, as such, shall not be considered an officer, but a function of the board of directors. In that case, the secretary shall perform the usual accounting duties of the treasurer, except that the funds shall be deposited only, as, and where authorized by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3110.

Any member may bring charges against an officer or director by filing them, in writing, with the secretary of the association, together with a petition which is signed by 5 percent of the members, which requests the removal of the officer or director in question. The removal shall be voted upon at the next regular or special meeting of the association and, by a vote of a majority of the members, the association may remove the officer or director and fill the vacancy. The director or officer against whom charges have been brought shall be informed, in writing, of the charges prior to the meeting and shall have an opportunity at the meeting to be heard in person or by counsel and to present witnesses. The person bringing the charges against the director or officer shall have the same opportunity.

If the bylaws provide for election of directors by districts with primary elections in each district, the petition for removal of a director shall be signed by 20 percent of the members that reside in the district from which the director was elected. The board of directors shall call a special meeting of the members that reside in that district to consider the removal of the director and, by a vote of the majority of the members of that district, the director in question shall be removed from office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Powers [3121. - 3131.]

3121.

An association may engage in any activity in connection with the selling, transporting, or storing of gas which is produced and delivered to it by its members; in any activity in connection with the purchase, hiring, or use by its members of supplies, machinery, or equipment directly related to the production, transmission, storage, or marketing of gas, or in the financing of any of these activities; or in any one or more of the activities which are specified in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 349, Sec. 1.1.)
-------------------------------------------

3122.

An association may borrow without limitation as to amount of corporate indebtedness or liability and may make advances to members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3123.

An association may act as the agent or representative of any member in any of the activites specified in Section 3171 or 3172.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3124.

An association may purchase or otherwise acquire, hold, own, and exercise all rights of ownership in, sell, transfer, pledge, or guarantee the payment of dividends or interest on, or the retirement or redemption of, shares of the capital stock or bonds of any corporation or association which is engaged in the production of gas or any related activity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3125.

An association may establish reserves and invest the funds of the reserves in bonds or in any other property as may be provided in the bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3126.

An association may buy, hold, and exercise all privileges of ownership of real or personal property as may be necessary or convenient for the conduct and operation of, or incidental to, any business of the association. Without limiting the foregoing, an association may acquire a real property easement from a public utility for the purpose of accommodating the association’s gas plant, and the easement shall be deemed to be held for a public purpose by the association, provided that the commission finds that the use by the association is in the public interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 230, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

3127.

An association may levy assessments in the manner and in the amount as may be provided in its bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3128.

An association may do all of the following:

(a) Do each and every thing which is necessary, suitable, or proper for the accomplishment of any of the purposes, or the attainment of any of the objects, specified in this chapter, or conducive to or expedient for the interest or benefit of the association, and contract accordingly.

(b) Exercise and possess all powers, rights, and privileges which are necessary or incidental to the purposes for which the association is organized or to the activities in which it is engaged.

(c) Have any other rights, powers, and privileges which are granted by the laws of this state to other corporations, except those which are inconsistent with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3130.

An association may organize, form, operate, own, control, and have an interest in, own stock of, or be a member of any other corporation, with or without capital stock, which is engaged in producing, transporting, or selling of gas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3131.

An association may, upon resolution adopted by its board of directors, enter into all necessary and proper contracts and agreements and make all necessary and proper stipulations, agreements, contracts, and arrangements with any other cooperative or other corporation or association, which is formed in this or in any other state, for the cooperative and more economical carrying on of its business or any part of its business.

Any two or more associations may, by agreement between them, unite in employing and using, or may separately employ and use, the same personnel, methods, means, and agencies for carrying on and conducting their respective business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Financial Provisions [3151. - 3154.]

3151.

(a) Any share or membership issued by an association is exempt from Part 2 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 1 of Title 4 of the Corporations Code if the aggregate investment of a shareholder or member in shares or memberships sold by an association does not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(b) This exemption does not apply to the shares or memberships in an association if any promoter of those shares or memberships expects or intends to make a profit directly or indirectly from any business or activity associated with the association or from the operation of the association or to receive a salary or other remuneration from the association. Furthermore, this exemption does not apply to nonvoting shares or memberships in an association issued to any person who does not possess, and who will not acquire in connection with the issuance of nonvoting memberships, voting power in the association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 349, Sec. 1.2.)
-------------------------------------------

3152.

If an association issues nonpar value stock, the issuance of that stock shall be governed by the terms of all general laws which cover the issuance of nonpar value stock in domestic corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3153.

If an association with preferred shares of stock purchases the stock or any property, or any interest in any property, of any person, it may discharge the obligations which are so incurred, in whole or in part, by exchanging for the acquired interest, shares of its preferred stock to an amount which at par value would equal the fair market value of the stock or interest so purchased, as determined by the board of directors. In that case, the transfer to the association of the stock or interest which is purchased is equivalent to payment in cash for the shares of stock which are issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3154.

The board of directors of an association shall cause to be sent to the members of the association, not later than 120 days after the close of the fiscal or calendar year, an annual report of the operations of the association, unless that report is expressly dispensed with in the bylaws.

If required by the bylaws, interim reports of the operations of the association for the three month, six month, or nine month periods of the current fiscal year of the association shall be furnished to the members of the association.

The annual report and any interim reports shall include a balance sheet as of the closing date. The financial statement shall be prepared from, and be in accordance with, the books. It shall be prepared in a form consistent with generally accepted accounting principles or in consultation with a certified public accountant or a public accountant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Members [3171. - 3181.]

3171.

Under the terms and conditions which are prescribed in the bylaws adopted by it, an association may admit as members or issue common stock to only those persons engaged in the production of gas which is to be handled by or through the association, or that use or employ any service or facility offered by the association on, or in connection with, land which is used for the production of gas, including the lessees and tenants of land which is used for the production of gas and any lessors, including any lessors, sublessors, or landlords that received as royalty, overriding royalty or rent, all or part of the gas or the value thereof, which is produced on the leased premises, and landlords that receive as rent all or part of the gas which is produced on the leased premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 349, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3172.

If a member of a nonstock association is other than a natural person, that member may be represented by any individual, associate, officer, manager, or member of it who is authorized in writing to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3173.

Any association may become a member or stockholder of any other association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3174.

If a member of an association which is established without shares of stock has paid the prescribed membership fee in full, the member shall receive a certificate of membership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3175.

An association shall not issue a certificate for stock to a member until it has been fully paid for. The promissory notes of the members may be accepted by the association as full or partial payment. The association shall hold the stock as security for the payment of the note, but that retention as security does not affect the member’s right to vote.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3176.

An association, in its bylaws, may limit the amount of common stock which any member may own.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3177.

The bylaws shall prohibit the transfer of the common stock or membership certificates of the associations to any person that is not qualified to be a shareholder or member, as specified in this chapter. These restrictions shall be printed upon every certificate of stock or membership which is subject to them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3178.

The association may, at any time, as specified in the bylaws, except when the debts of the association exceed 50 percent of its assets, buy in or purchase its common stock at the book value of the common stock, as conclusively determined by the board of directors, and pay for it in cash within one year thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3179.

A member is not liable for the debts of the association in an amount which exceeds the sum which remains unpaid on the member’s or stockholder’s membership fee or subscription to the capital stock, including any unpaid balance on any promissory note which is given in payment of the membership fee or the subscription to the capital stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3180.

No public utility, corporation holding a controlling interest in a public utility, or subsidiary or affiliate of a public utility may be a member of an association organized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3181.
